Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB334.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the following:* * *(16.2) Article XIX-L.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-LPENNSYLVANIA INDIVIDUAL RECRUITMENTAND RETENTION TAX CREDITSection 1901-L. Scope of article.This article relates to the Pennsylvania Individual Recruitment and Retention Tax Credit.Section 1902-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Qualifying taxpayer." Either:(1) a resident individual who becomes a recently certified professional after December 31, 2024, and subsequently obtains employment within this Commonwealth after December 31, 2024, in the field for which the individual is certified; or(2) an individual who was certified in another state of the United States in one of the fields enumerated in the definition of recently certified professional prior to January 1, 2025, becomes a resident individual of this Commonwealth after December 31, 2024, and obtains employment in this Commonwealth in the field for which the individual is certified.20250HB0334PN0289 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Recently certified professional." An individual who receives one of the following after December 31, 2024:(1) One of the following teaching certifications:(i) Instructional certificate - level I.(ii) Educational specialist certificate - level I.(iii) Program specialist certificate.(iv) Supervisory certificate; administrative certificate - level I.(v) Letters of eligibility.(vi) Career and technical education instructional certificate - instructional I.(vii) Career and technical supervisory certificate.(viii) Career and technical education director certificate.(2) A certification received under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to Municipal Police Education and Training).(3) A graduate of the Pennsylvania State Police Academy.(4) A certification received under 44 Pa.C.S. Ch. 74 (relating to sheriffs and deputy sheriffs), except individuals elected to the Office of Sheriff.(5) One of the following health care professional credentials:(i) Registered nurse.(ii) Licensed practical nurse.(iii) Certified registered nurse practitioner.(iv) Clinical nurse specialist.(v) Certified registered nurse anesthetists.(vi) Registered nurse aid."Resident individual." As defined in section 301.20250HB0334PN0289 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Tax credit." The Pennsylvania Individual Recruitment and Retention Tax Credit authorized under this article."Tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed on individuals under section 302."Taxpayer." A resident individual subject to the tax imposed under Article III.Section 1903-L. Credit for attraction and retention of needed professionals.(a) Tax credit.--For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, a qualifying taxpayer may claim a tax credit, to be known as the Pennsylvania Individual Recruitment and Retention Tax Credit, not to exceed $2,500 against the taxpayer's tax liability for wages earned as a recently certified professional.(b) Claim of tax credit.--A taxpayer must claim a tax credit on a return filed under section 330.(c) Adequate proof of qualifications.--A taxpayer must provide the department with proof that the taxpayer meets the requirements of a qualified taxpayer.(d) Applicability of tax credit.--The tax credit shall be considered a payment of estimated tax made under Part VIII of Article III.(e) Duration of tax credit.--A taxpayer may claim the tax credit for the year in which the taxpayer first becomes a qualified taxpayer and the next two succeeding tax years, as long as the taxpayer remains employed in the field in which the individual is certified.Section 1904-L. Prohibitions.A taxpayer may not carry over, carry back, sell, assign or transfer a tax credit.Section 1905-L. Departmental duties.20250HB0334PN0289 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The department shall publish guidelines and may promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation and administration of this article.Section 1906-L. Applicability.The tax credit shall apply to individuals who become qualifying taxpayers after December 31, 2024, and prior to January 1, 2028.Section 1907-L. Expiration.This article shall expire December 31, 2030.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0334PN0289 - 5 - 12345678910